Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Article 15 Hospital Acquisition

31-7-400.
Definitions.

As used in this article the term:

“Acquiring entity” means an individual, business corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, joint venture, nonprofit corporation, hospital authority, or any other for profit or not for profit entity which is a purchaser or lessee of an acquisition.

“Acquisition” means a purchase or lease by an acquiring entity of the assets of a hospital which is owned, controlled, or operated by a nonprofit corporation and which meets one or more of the following conditions:

Constitutes a purchase or lease of 50 percent or more of the assets of a hospital having a permit under this chapter; or

Constitutes a purchase or lease which, when combined with one or more transfers between the same or related parties occurring within a five-year period, constitutes a purchase or lease of 50 percent or more of the assets of a hospital having a permit under this chapter;

provided, however, that an acquisition does not include the restructuring of a hospital owned by a hospital authority involving a lease of assets to any not for profit or for profit entity which has a principal place of business located in the same county where the main campus of the hospital in question is located and which is not owned, in whole or in part, or controlled by any other for profit or not for profit entity whose principal place of business is located outside such county; provided, further, that an acquisition does not include a restructuring of a nonprofit health system involving the purchase or lease of the assets of a hospital controlled as of March 1, 1999, by the health system’s nonprofit parent corporation by another nonprofit entity which is both exempt from federal income taxation and controlled by the same nonprofit parent corporation.

“Attorney General” means the Attorney General of the State of Georgia or some other attorney employed in the Attorney General’s office and designated to perform the functions required by this article.

“Control” or “controlling interest” means ownership of 50 percent or more of the assets of the entity in question or the ability to influence significantly the operations or decisions of the entity in question.

“Disposition” means a sale or lease of the assets of a hospital which is owned, controlled, or operated by a nonprofit corporation to an acquiring entity which meets one or more of the following conditions:

Constitutes a sale or lease of 50 percent or more of the assets of a hospital having a permit under this chapter; or

Constitutes a sale or lease which, when combined with one or more transfers between the same or related parties occurring within a five-year period, constitutes a sale or lease of 50 percent or more of the assets of a hospital having a permit under this chapter;

provided, however, that a disposition does not include the restructuring of a hospital owned by a hospital authority involving a lease of assets to any not for profit or for profit entity which has a principal place of business located in the same county where the main campus of the hospital in question is located and which is not owned, in whole or in part, or controlled by any other for profit or not for profit entity whose principal place of business is located outside such county; provided, further, that a disposition does not include a restructuring of a nonprofit health system involving the sale or lease of the assets of a hospital controlled as of March 1, 1999, by the health system’s nonprofit parent corporation to another nonprofit entity which is both exempt from federal income taxation and controlled by the same nonprofit parent corporation.

“Family” means a spouse, child, or sibling.

“Financial interest” means the direct or indirect ownership of any assets or stock of any business.

“Hospital” means any institution classified and having a permit as a hospital from the Department of Community Health pursuant to this chapter and such department’s rules and regulations.

“Related party” means an individual, business corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, joint venture, nonprofit corporation, or any other for profit or not for profit entity that owns or controls, is owned or controlled by, or operates under common ownership or control with a party in question.

“Transaction” means an acquisition and disposition.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-400

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 850, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 12, § 2-26/SB 433.

Law reviews.

For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000).

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

31-7-401.
Notice to Attorney General of acquisition.

No acquiring entity shall engage in an acquisition without first notifying the Attorney General pursuant to this article. No nonprofit corporation which owns, controls, or operates, directly or indirectly, a hospital having a permit under this chapter shall engage in a disposition without first notifying the Attorney General pursuant to this article. The parties to the transaction shall provide the Attorney General with at least 90 days’ notice of the proposed transaction prior to its consummation.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-401

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1.

31-7-402.
Content and form of notice to Attorney General; retention of experts; payment of costs and expenses.

Notice to the Attorney General required by this article shall include the name of the seller or lessor; the name of the acquiring entity and other parties to the acquisition; the county in which the main campus of the hospital is located; the terms of the proposed agreement and any related agreements including leases, management contracts, and service contracts; the acquisition price; a copy of the acquisition agreement and any related agreements including leases, management contracts, and service contracts; any valuations of the hospital’s assets prepared in the three years immediately preceding the proposed transaction date; a financial and economic analysis and report from any expert or consultant retained by the seller or lessor which addresses each of the criteria set forth in Code Section 31-7-406; articles of incorporation and bylaws of the nonprofit corporation and related entities and foundations; all donative documents reflecting the purposes of prior gifts of more than $100,000.00 in value by donors to the nonprofit corporation or any related entities or foundations for or on behalf of the hospital; and all documents pertaining to the disposition of assets, including those documents which are included as schedules or exhibits to the acquisition agreement and any related agreements.

The Attorney General may prescribe a form of notice to be utilized by the seller or lessor and the acquiring entity and may require information in addition to that specified in this article if the disclosure of such information is determined by the Attorney General to be in the public interest. The notice to the Attorney General required by this article and all documents related thereto shall be considered public records pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

The Attorney General shall be authorized to retain financial, economic, health planning, or other experts or consultants to assist in addressing each of the criteria set forth in Code Section 31-7-406. Within 30 days after notice from the Attorney General, the actual and reasonable cost and expense incurred in connection with the retention of such experts or consultants shall be paid directly to such experts and consultants by the parties to the proposed transaction in such proportionate amounts as the parties may agree or otherwise as determined by the Attorney General.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-402

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 711, § 1/HB 667; Ga. L. 2012, p. 218, § 6/HB 397.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2012).

31-7-403.
Certification of interest in acquiring entity; certification of financial interest in business associated with party to disposition; statement of fair dealing; opposing board members exempt.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, notice to the Attorney General required by this article shall also include a separate certification from each member of the governing board and the chief executive officer of the nonprofit corporation which is a party to the proposed disposition, and from each member of the governing board and the chief executive officer of any nonprofit corporation that holds a membership, stock, or controlling interest therein, executed under oath, stating whether that director or officer of the nonprofit corporation is then or may become within the three-year period following the completion of the transaction a member or shareholder in, or officer, employee, agent, or consultant of, or will otherwise derive any compensation or benefits, directly or indirectly, from the acquiring entity or any related party in connection with or as a result of the disposition.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, notice to the Attorney General required by this article shall also include a certification from each member of the governing board and the chief executive officer of the nonprofit corporation which is a party to the proposed disposition, and from each member of the governing board and the chief executive officer of any nonprofit corporation that holds a membership, stock, or controlling interest therein, executed under oath:

Disclosing any financial interest held by that individual or that individual’s family, or held by any business in which such individual or the individual’s family owns a financial interest, in any business which:

Within the immediately preceding 12 month period sold products, property interests, or services to the nonprofit corporation engaged in the disposition; or

Within the immediately preceding 12 month period sold or within the three-year period after the completion of the transaction may sell products, property interests, or services to the acquiring entity;

Disclosing any contract pursuant to which a sale was made or may be made of those products, property interests, or services regarding financial interests which are disclosed pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection;

Stating that the nonprofit corporation has received fair market value for its assets or, in the case of a proposed disposition to a not for profit entity or a hospital authority, stating that the nonprofit corporation has received an enforceable commitment of fair and reasonable community benefits for its assets;

Stating that the market value of the hospital’s assets has not been manipulated to decrease their value;

Stating that the terms of the transaction are fair and reasonable to the nonprofit corporation;

Stating that the transaction is authorized by the nonprofit corporation’s governing documents and is consistent with the intent of any major donors who have contributed over $100,000.00;

Stating that the proceeds of the transaction will be used solely in a manner consistent with the charitable purposes of the nonprofit corporation and will not be used, directly or indirectly, to benefit the acquiring entity; and

Stating that the transaction will not adversely affect the availability or accessibility of health care services in the county in which the main campus of the hospital is located.

The certification requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section shall not apply to any governing board members who vote to oppose the proposed disposition.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-403

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 31.

31-7-404.
Publication of notice.

Within ten working days after receipt of notice under this article, the Attorney General shall publish notice of the proposed transaction in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the main campus of the hospital is located and shall notify in writing the governing authority of such county. The published notice required by this Code section shall state that the Attorney General has received notice of a proposed transaction, the names of the parties to the proposed transaction, the date, time, and place of the public hearing regarding the transaction, and the means by which a person may submit written comments about the proposed transaction to the Attorney General.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-404

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1.

31-7-405.
Public hearing; expert or consultant required to testify; testimony; representative of acquiring entity to testify.

Within 60 days after receipt of the notice under this article, the Attorney General shall conduct a public hearing regarding the proposed transaction in the county in which the main campus of the hospital is located. At such hearing, the Attorney General shall provide an opportunity for those persons in favor of the transaction, those persons opposed to the transaction, and other interested persons to be heard. The Attorney General shall also receive written comments regarding the transaction from any interested person, and such written comments shall be considered public records pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

Any expert or consultant retained by the nonprofit corporation to prepare the financial and economic analysis of the proposed transaction shall be required to appear and testify at the public hearing regarding his or her report if requested to do so by the Attorney General and may be questioned by the Attorney General. Such expert or consultant shall make the same disclosure required by members and officers under paragraphs (1) and (2) of subsection (b) of Code Section 31-7-403. The independent expert or consultant retained by the Attorney General to review the proposed transaction shall also appear and testify at the public hearing regarding his or her findings and analysis.

At least one member of the governing board of the seller or lessor shall be designated by the seller or lessor, and at least one representative of the acquiring entity shall be designated by the acquiring entity, which designees shall appear and testify under oath at the public hearing and shall be subject to questioning by the Attorney General.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-405

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 218, § 7/HB 397.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2012 amendment of this Code section, see 29 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2012).

31-7-406.
Purpose of public hearing; factors to be addressed in disclosure.

The purpose of the public hearing shall be to ensure that the public’s interest is protected when the assets of a nonprofit hospital are acquired by an acquiring entity by requiring full disclosure of the purpose and terms of the transaction and providing an opportunity for local public input. The disposition of a nonprofit hospital to an acquiring entity shall not be in the public interest unless there has been adequate disclosure that appropriate steps have been taken to ensure that the transaction is authorized, to safeguard the value of charitable assets, and to ensure that any proceeds of the transaction are used for appropriate charitable health care purposes. Such disclosure shall address, at a minimum, the following factors:

Whether the disposition is permitted under Chapter 3 of Title 14, the “Georgia Nonprofit Corporation Code,” and other laws of Georgia governing nonprofit entities, trusts, or charities;

Whether the disposition is consistent with the directives of major donors who have contributed over $100,000.00;

Whether the governing body of the nonprofit corporation exercised due diligence in deciding to dispose of hospital assets, selecting the acquiring entity, and negotiating the terms and conditions of the disposition;

The procedures used by the nonprofit corporation in making its decision to dispose of its assets, including whether appropriate expert assistance was used;

Whether any conflict of interest was disclosed, including, but not limited to, conflicts of interest related to directors or officers of the nonprofit corporation and experts retained by the parties to the transaction;

Whether the seller or lessor will receive fair value for its assets, including an appropriate control premium for any relinquishment of control or, in the case of a proposed disposition to a not for profit entity, will receive an enforceable commitment for fair and reasonable community benefits for its assets;

Whether charitable assets are placed at unreasonable risk if the transaction is financed in part by the seller or lessor;

Whether the terms of any management or services contract negotiated in conjunction with the transaction are reasonable;

Whether any disposition proceeds will be used for appropriate charitable health care purposes consistent with the nonprofit corporation’s original purpose or for the support and promotion of health care in the affected community;

Whether a meaningful right of first refusal to repurchase the assets by a successor nonprofit corporation or foundation has been retained if the acquiring entity subsequently proposes to sell, lease, or transfer the hospital to yet another entity;

Whether sufficient safeguards are included to assure the affected community continued access to affordable care and to the range of services historically provided by the nonprofit corporation;

Whether the acquiring entity has made an enforceable commitment to provide health care to the disadvantaged, the uninsured, and the underinsured and to provide benefits to the affected community to promote improved health care; and

Whether health care providers will be offered the opportunity to invest or own an interest in the acquiring entity or a related party, and whether procedures or safeguards are in place to avoid conflict of interest in patient referrals.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-406

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1.

31-7-407.
Attorney General to ensure compliance with article; other persons not precluded from instituting judicial proceedings.

The Attorney General shall have the authority to ensure compliance with any and all notices, certifications, obligations, and commitments which are required to be made in connection with a transaction under this article and may institute proceedings to enforce such compliance in the superior court of the county in which the main campus of the hospital is located. This provision shall not preclude any other person with standing from instituting judicial proceedings regarding the proposed disposition.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-407

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1.

31-7-407.1.
Report of findings.

The Attorney General shall issue a report of findings addressing the issues outlined in Code Section 31-7-406 within 30 days of the public hearing; provided, however, the time for issuing said report may be extended for an additional 30 days if the Attorney General finds there has been a failure by the entities involved in the transaction under review or any of them, to comply with disclosures required by this article or to respond to subpoenas or other process authorized by this article, and additional extensions may be ordered upon a continuation of a failure to so comply.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-407.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, this Code section, enacted as 31-4-407.1, was redesignated as Code Section 31-7-407.1.

31-7-408.
Notice required prior to issuance or renewal of permit to operate hospital; permit subject to revocation or suspension for failure to comply.

No permit to operate a hospital may be issued or renewed under this chapter or any other applicable statute or regulation and a permit which has been issued shall be subject to revocation or suspension if there is a disposition or acquisition of hospital assets as defined in this article without notice first having been provided to the Attorney General as required by this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-408

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1.

31-7-409.
Prospective operation of article.

Any transaction completed before October 31, 1997, or any transaction that is subject to a pending definitive agreement as of October 31, 1997, and which is either conditioned only upon receipt of regulatory approval, or is subject to a pending judicial proceeding as of April 1, 1997, is not subject to the requirements of this article.

Any lease which is exempted from the operation of this article pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section and which contained, on October 31, 1997, an option to renew that lease upon its expiration shall not be subject to this article upon any renewal on or after April 28, 1999.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-409

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 850, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1997, “October 31, 1997,” was substituted for “the effective date of this article” in two places.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1999, “April 28,” was substituted for “the date this subsection becomes effective in” in subsection (b).

31-7-410.
Authority of Attorney General unaffected.

No provision of this article shall derogate from the common law or statutory authority of the Attorney General.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-410

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1.

31-7-411.
Attorney General’s power under article same as under Code Section 45-15-17.

In connection with the Attorney General’s responsibilities under this article and in connection with the public hearing required by this article, the Attorney General shall have the same power to investigate and issue subpoenas as the Attorney General has with respect to investigations authorized under Code Section 45-15-17.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-411

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1.

31-7-412.
Disposition or acquisition made in violation of requirements of article null and void; violators subject to fine; Attorney General to instigate proceedings to impose fine within one year.

Any disposition or acquisition of assets made in violation of the notice, disclosure, and certification requirements of this article shall be null and void, and each nonprofit entity and acquiring entity engaging in such disposition or acquisition shall be subject to a fine of up to $50,000.00, the amount of which shall be determined by the superior court in the county in which the main campus of the hospital is located. The Attorney General shall institute proceedings to impose such fine within one year of the unlawful disposition or acquisition.

Any person knowingly and willfully making a false statement in a certification under Code Section 31-7-403 or subsection (b) of Code Section 31-7-405, in addition to any criminal penalty which may be imposed pursuant to Code Section 16-10-71, shall be subject to a civil fine of up to $50,000.00, the amount of which shall be determined by the superior court in the county in which the main campus of the hospital is located. The Attorney General shall institute proceedings to impose such fine within one year of the date of the certification.

History.

Code 1981, §

31-7-412

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1091, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 850, § 3.